Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 2

ADMINISTRATION
OF INSURANCE LAWS

PART I.
INSURANCE DIVISION

§431:2-101 Insurance division. The
insurance division is established within the department of commerce and
consumer affairs. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next